North Dakota, session 69, HB1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - RISKS OF OIL AND CHEMICAL
SPILLS ON STATE HIGHWAYS WITHIN THE FORT BERTHOLD RESERVATION. During the
2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying environmental and public
health risks of oil and chemical spills on state highways within the Fort Berthold Reservation.
The study must include input from the Three Affiliated Tribes of the Fort Berthold Reservation,
the department of environmental quality, and the department of health and human services. The
legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.1326.01000